Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 3. Executive
Executive Order No. 3-67
(No. 03-15) [Ban the Box Hiring Policy.

WHEREAS, Vermonters with criminal records suffer from discrimination in many areas of life, including employment opportunities;

WHEREAS, state government is committed to modeling fair hiring practices for all Vermont employers;

WHEREAS, too many Vermonters with criminal records are unable to successfully re-enter their communities due to lack of employment and self-sufficiency;

WHEREAS, Vermonters with criminal records represent a workforce with skills to contribute and a desire to add value to their communities;

WHEREAS, studies indicate that stable employment is one of the best predictors of post-conviction success;

WHEREAS, employment of those with criminal records promotes public safety and cost-containment by significantly reducing the risk of recidivism and incarceration;

WHEREAS, a “ban the box” hiring policy increases the opportunity of applicants with criminal records to explain their circumstances while preserving employers’ ability to ultimately conduct a criminal background check as part of the hiring process;

WHEREAS, such a policy removes questions related to a job applicant’s criminal record in the initial stage of many employment applications, thereby preventing the conviction from serving as an immediate reason for screening out an applicant when the conviction
may have little or no bearing on the work to be performed;

WHEREAS, states across the country have adopted hiring practices to remove unfair barriers to employment of people with criminal records; and

WHEREAS, the U.S. Equal Employment Opportunity Commission, to maximize compliance with federal anti-discrimination law, recommends delaying inquiry of a job applicant’s conviction history and considering the job-relatedness of the conviction.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as the Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order and direct that the Department of Human Resources create and implement a “ban the box” hiring policy that
encourages job applications from all motivated, hardworking, and otherwise qualified people, regardless of a person’s criminal record. Such a policy shall provide qualified applicants the opportunity to explain a criminal record when
applying for state positions, but shall not affect positions for which a criminal conviction makes a candidate ineligible regardless of the circumstances.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated April 21, 2015

Executive Order No. 3-68
(No. 06-15) [Transfer of Certain Land and Permanent Easements in the Town of Killington from ANR to VTRANS.

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation (“VTRANS”) needs to construct Transportation Project Killington ER 022-1(27), which involves the replacement of Bridge #118 carrying a state highway known as Vermont Route 100 over Kent Brook, and which affects land
under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, and Department of Forest, Parks, and Recreation (“ANR”); and

WHEREAS, VTRANS and ANR desire to complete the transfer of the necessary land and/or rights and easements from ANR to VTRANS.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to VTRANS jurisdiction and control of land and permanent easements of ANR’s described below:

Parcel One:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following instruments:

Warranty Deed of Susan Stodghill to the State of Vermont, dated July 20, 1991, and recorded in Book 124, Pages 149-151; and

Guardian’s Deed of N. Warren Fellows, as Guardian unto Clara E. Kent, to the State of Vermont, dated February 8, 1958, and recorded in Book 20, Pages 470-471;

all of the Town of Killington Land Records and being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcel #1, consisting of 271 square feet, land and rights therein, as shown on right of way detail sheet 1 and right of way layout sheet 1 of the revised plans of Transportation Project Killington ER 022-1(27) (“the Transportation Project”) as filed
on the 20th day of May, 2015, in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Killington.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the grantor, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, install project demarcation fence
and erosion control barriers and to keep the erosion control barriers clear of debris and functioning properly, throughout the construction of the project, as necessary and as noted on the project plans; and undertake
general construction functions in an area of 597 square feet, more or less, left of and between approximate stations 103+00.00 and 103+28.60 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement to construct and maintain the channel of a certain stream of water, known as the Kent Brook, now running on land of the grantor, including the right to install and maintain stone fill, as well as a temporary easement during the period
of construction to enter upon land of the grantor to install erosion control barriers and to keep the erosion control barriers clear of debris and functioning properly, throughout the construction of the project, as
necessary and as noted on the project plans, in an area of 507 square feet, more or less, and located left of and between approximate stations 103+00.00 and 103+28.49 of the established centerline of the Transportation
Project.

Parcel Two:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following instruments:

Guardian’s Deed of N. Warren Fellows, as Guardian unto Clara E. Kent, to the State of Vermont, dated January 27, 1959, and recorded at Book 21, Pages 46-47; and

Guardian’s Deed of N. Warren Fellows, as Guardian unto Clara E. Kent, to the State of Vermont, dated February 8, 1958, and recorded at Book 20, Pages 470-471.

all of the Town of Killington Land Records and being more particularly described as follows:

Being Parcels #2A-B, consisting of 2,055 square feet, land and rights therein, as shown on right of way detail sheet 1 and right of way layout sheet 1 of the revised plans of Transportation Project Killington ER 022-1(27) (“the Transportation Project”),
as filed on the 20th day of May, 2015, in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Killington.

In connection with the above parcel the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

Temporary easements during the period of construction to enter upon land of the grantor, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, install project demarcation fence and
erosion control barriers and to keep the erosion control barriers clear of debris and functioning properly, throughout the construction of the project, as necessary and as noted on the project plans; and undertake general
construction functions: in an area of 925 square feet, more or less, left of and between approximate stations 103+52 and 104+10; in an area of 832 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations
102+44 and 103+00; and in an area of 686 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations 103+52 and 104+10; all stations are of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated September 16, 2015

Executive Order No. 3-69
(No. 07-15) [Health in All Policies Task Force.

WHEREAS, the health and well-being of all Vermonters is critical for a prosperous and sustainable state;

WHEREAS, integrating consideration of health impacts into a variety of state policies, including those related to air and water quality, natural resources and agricultural land, housing, infrastructure, public health, sustainable communities, and climate
change can benefit Vermonters’ quality of life and economic prosperity;

WHEREAS, such policies influence the adoption of healthy lifestyles by making it more or less difficult for individuals to choose behaviors that promote or diminish health;

WHEREAS, largely avoidable chronic illnesses are a growing burden for the State and its people, and negatively affect Vermonters’ productivity, quality of life, life expectancy, and health care costs;

WHEREAS, health is an outcome of a wide range of factors, many of which lie outside the activities of the health sector and require a shared responsibility and an integrated and sustained policy response across government; and

WHEREAS, to improve health outcomes now and in the future, agencies should collaborate with each other to ensure that health is considered when policies are developed.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish the Health in All Policies (HiAP) Task Force.

Composition and Charge.

The Health in All Policies (HiAP) Task Force will identify strategies to more fully integrate health considerations into all state programs and policies, and promote better health outcomes through interagency collaboration and partnership.

The Task Force shall be Chaired by the Commissioner of Health and staffed by the Department of Health (DOH), and shall work with representatives from the following agencies and departments:

Agency of Administration

Agency of Agriculture

Agency of Commerce and Community Development

Agency of Education

Agency of Human Services

Agency of Natural Resources

Agency of Transportation

Public Service Department

Department of Health

In addition, the Task Force may seek members from any other entity identified by the Task Force, including but not limited to the Public Service Board, the Natural Resources Board, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board, and the Vermont Housing Finance
Board.

The Task Force shall meet at the call of the Chair.

By January 15, 2016, and thereafter annually, the Task Force will report to the Governor on:

1.
Potential opportunities to include health criteria in regulatory, programmatic and budgetary decisions;

2.
Promising practices in other jurisdictions to identify opportunities for innovation and coordination across sectors that include consideration of potential positive and negative health impacts of decisions;
and

3.
Evidence-based actions and policies to improve the wellness of state employees across state government, including healthy food procurement policies.

In consultation with the Task Force, DOH shall develop guidance, criteria and analytic tools to support all branches of government in assessing potential positive or negative health impacts when proposing new agency rules, budgetary changes, or major
programmatic shifts.

Members of the HiAP Task Force will regularly report internally on their progress in embedding health impacts in their rulemaking, policies and programs. The Task Force may establish sub-committees and internal policies as necessary and appropriate to
carry out its work.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated October 6, 2015

Executive Order No. 3-70
(No. 08-15) [Transfer of Property in Windsor from BGS to DFW.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-80 (codified as Executive Order No. 08-17), dated March 13, 2017.

Executive Order No. 3-71
(No. 01-16) [Transfer of Certain Easements in the Town of Middlesex from BGS to VTrans.

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation (“VTrans”) needs to construct Transportation Project Middlesex IM 089-2(41) (“the Transportation Project”), which involves the replacement of Bridge #55 carrying a federal highway known as U.S. Route 2 over Interstate
89 in Middlesex, Vermont, and which affects land under the jurisdiction of the Department of Buildings and General Services (“BGS”); and

WHEREAS, VTrans and BGS desire to complete the transfer of the necessary easements and/or rights from BGS to VTrans.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to VTrans jurisdiction and control of certain land and permanent easements of BGS, which are more
particularly describes as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the Warranty Deed of Jambro Associates, dated July 22, 1988, and recorded in Book 51, Page 577 of the Town of Middlesex Land Records and being more particularly described as:

Being Parcel #2, rights and easements therein, as shown on right of way detail sheet 1 and right of way layout sheets 3-5 of the revised plans of the Transportation Project as filed on the 25th day of March, 2015, in the office of the Clerk of the Town
of Middlesex.

In connection with the above parcel, the following easements and/or rights are conveyed:

Temporary easements to enter upon land of the grantor, during the period of construction, to extend highway slopes and embankments in areas of: 563 square feet, more or less; 200 square feet, more or less; and 2,799 square feet, more or less, as shown
on the previously mentioned Transportation Project plans.

The State of Vermont may extend the slopes and embankments at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of transportation construction. The State of Vermont shall
have the right to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff, and other objectionable materials, structures, growth, and any other things of whatever kind or nature from said slope area.

Temporary easements during the period of construction to enter upon land of the grantor, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris, install project demarcation fence and
erosion control barriers and to keep the erosion control barriers clear of debris and functioning properly, throughout the construction of the project, as necessary and as noted on the project plans; and undertake general construction
functions: in an area of 586 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations 20+42 and 21+88; in an area of 51 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations 21+99 and 22+15; and in an area
of 1,255 square feet, more or less, right of approximate stations 25+64 and 29+26.32; all stations are of the established centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement to discharge water on land of the grantor as such water may hereafter be discharged or flow in an area of 0.52 acre (22,807 square feet), more or less, right of and between approximate stations 21+00.00 and 29+18.55 of the established
centerline of the Transportation Project.

A permanent easement to install, construct and maintain a culvert and drainage ditch, in an area of 27 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations 22+00.52 and 22+12.39 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project,
and thereby the right to discharge water through said culvert and drainage ditch onto the land of the grantor.

A permanent easement to install, construct and maintain a culvert, including stone fill, in an area of 431 square feet, more or less, right of and between approximate stations 26+6.94 and 26+52.22 of the established centerline of the Transportation Project,
and thereby the right to discharge water through said culvert and drainage ditch onto the land of the grantor.

The herein conveyed rights and easements are subject to the terms and conditions of Vermont Operational Stormwater Discharge Permit #7145-INDS, as the same may be amended from time to time.

This Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated February 9, 2016

Executive Order No. 3-72
(No. 02-16) [Disability Employment Working Group.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is committed to developing and maintaining a high-performing workforce that provides access, meaningful services, and improved outcomes for all citizens; and

WHEREAS, to achieve this goal, the state workforce must include a diversity of perspectives that reflects all Vermonters, including people with disabilities; and

WHEREAS, currently only 34.6 percent of Vermont’s 41,500 working-age people with disabilities are employed and, in 2014, an estimated 24.2 percent of Vermonters aged 18 to 64 with a disability lived in families with incomes below the poverty line; and

WHEREAS, the State has a vested interest in preventing discrimination against people living with a disability, eliminating barriers to meaningful employment, and attracting the highest quality candidates into state employment opportunities; and

WHEREAS, continued progress towards serving and employing people with disabilities requires both the commitment and participation of executive leaders throughout state government.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby order and direct that a “Disability Employment Working Group” be established under the auspices of the Governor’s Workforce Equity and Diversity
Council (“GWEDC”) as follows:

Composition and Process.

The Commissioner of the Department of Human Resources (“DHR”) or designee shall chair the Working Group. The Working Group shall have up to five members, including:

The Commissioner of DHR or designee;

The Commissioner of the Department of Disabilities, Aging and Independent Living (“DAIL”) or designee; and

Up to three members of the GWEDC appointed by its chair or co-chairs.

The Working Group shall meet at the call of the Chair.

Charge.

The Disability Employment Working Group shall make recommendations regarding hiring practices to increase access to state employment for individuals with disabilities. The Working Group shall consider, among other strategies:

Partnering with employment organizations and other community groups to identify and recruit qualified applicants and promote state employment opportunities;

Reviewing current training programs for all state employees to ensure coverage of disability etiquette and best practices;

Implementing the “Progressive Employment” model, in which participants are exposed to a series of short-term work experiences, through the use of internships or trainee programs;

Identifying and accessing short-term skills training in high-demand areas to meet state workforce demands; and

Recommending further steps to bring individuals with disabilities into state employment at a rate that is as close as possible to that of the general population of working Vermonters, and comparing progress made each year to increase hiring opportunities
and the integrated employment of those with disabilities, while maintaining the confidentiality of employees’ personal information.

Report.

The GWEDC shall include an update on disability employment in the state workforce as part of its annual report.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated March 23, 2016

Executive Order No. 3-73
(No. 03-16) [Publicly Funded Housing for the Homeless.

WHEREAS, homelessness has been a persistent and growing problem within Vermont for more than 30 years, affecting children, young adults, working families, and veterans;

WHEREAS, both the financial and human costs of homelessness strain public services including health care, mental health care, and education;

WHEREAS, as federal housing resources have declined, affordable housing production in Vermont has slowed and homelessness has increased;

WHEREAS, Vermont has a commitment to the quality of life for all of its citizens, including through the launch of a statewide initiative to end child and family homelessness in Vermont by 2020;

WHEREAS, State investments targeted to Vermonters experiencing homelessness — including the Vermont Rental Subsidy, Family Supportive Housing, Housing Opportunity Program, and Subsidy and Care Program — have shown effectiveness at breaking the cycle of
homelessness;

WHEREAS, housing partners such as the Vermont State Housing Authority, the Vermont Housing Finance Agency, and the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board have targeted and coordinated resources to create supportive housing opportunities for Vermonters
who are homeless;

WHEREAS, the 2015 annual point-in-time count showed a modest decrease in homelessness statewide, and housing partners across Vermont should commit to building on successes to date; and

WHEREAS, in addition to increasing access to affordable housing, success in ending homelessness requires a coordinated continuum of supports and services including Short-Term Emergency Shelter, Targeted Transitional Housing, Rental Subsidies, Targeted
Homelessness Prevention Activities, Rapid Re-Housing, and Supportive Housing.

NOW, THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby establish a goal that owners of publicly funded housing make available at least 15% of their affordable housing portfolio to homeless families
and individuals, including those with special needs who require service support and rental assistance to secure and maintain their housing.

To implement this goal, I hereby direct that:

Housing organizations and homeless service providers that receive state funds, state-allocated grants, and/or state tax credits shall work together to coordinate rental subsidies, services, and economic support such that, when publicly supported housing
units become available, homeless families and individuals have the assistance and support needed to make use of those units. These organizations are encouraged to adopt Memoranda of Understanding or other mechanisms as tools to
plan for achievement of this goal.

To ensure that homeless Vermonters have both the necessary supports and affordable housing to achieve success, the Agency of Human Services (“AHS”) shall prioritize and coordinate services and subsidies to homeless families and individuals, and shall
encourage recipients of AHS grants to work together with housing partners to meet the 15% goal.

Public housing authorities and owners of privately owned publicly supported affordable housing are encouraged to work towards the goal of making at least 15% of their units available to homeless families and individuals as units change hands and are developed.

The Vermont Community Development Program (“VCDP”), the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (“VHCB”), and the Vermont Housing Finance Agency (“VHFA”) shall work together to develop funding criteria that requires applicants for housing grants or tax
credits to describe plans and tools to achieve the goal of making at least 15% of their permanent, publicly supported housing units available to the homeless. These funding criteria shall apply to all applicants for housing grants
or tax credits, subject to limited exceptions. Applicants will also be asked to describe any “non-permanent” assistance, such as shelter beds or transitional housing units. VCDP, VHCB, and VHFA shall report annually to the Agency
of Commerce and Community Development and AHS on the results of this effort.

AHS shall provide training to housing managers and housing and homeless service providers on how to successfully work with formerly homeless households.

State agencies and housing agencies are encouraged to seek new sources of federal and philanthropic funding for housing development, services and subsidies.

In working towards the 15% goal, owners of age-restricted housing shall not be required to make units available to individuals who do not meet their age restrictions.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated April 20, 2016

Executive Order No. 3-74
(No. 04-16) [Vermont Strong License Plates.

WHEREAS, Vermont passed legislation creating Vermont Strong Commemorative License Plates in 2012 to “recognize all of those who have suffered losses because of the destruction brought by Tropical Storm Irene and the flooding of 2011, and to commemorate
the contributions of the many who are helping to rebuild Vermont and to make it stronger”;

WHEREAS, in 2014, the General Assembly extended the display of Vermont Strong License plates to June 30, 2016;

WHEREAS, the Vermont Strong license plate continues to be an important symbol of Vermont’s resiliency and commitment to the many communities, businesses, and families impacted by Tropical Storm Irene and other major flooding events; and

WHEREAS, under section 511(a) of title 23, “[a] motor vehicle operated on any highway shall have displayed in a conspicuous place either one or two number plates as the Commissioner may require.”

NOW, THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order and direct that:

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles shall continue to permit Vermonters to display Vermont Strong Commemorative License Plates on the front of eligible vehicles;

Vermont law enforcement officers shall refrain from ticketing or otherwise penalizing any Vermonter with a Vermont Strong Commemorative License Plate as the front plate on an eligible vehicle until the General Assembly next has the opportunity to consider
and clarify the duration of Vermont Strong Commemorative License Plates; and

The Commissioner of Motor Vehicles and the Commissioner of Public Safety shall take all necessary and appropriate actions to implement this Order with state and local law enforcement.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated June 2, 2016

Executive Order No. 3-75
(No. 05-16) [Climate Change Considerations in State Procurements.

WHEREAS, climate change is the most urgent environmental issue of our time;

WHEREAS, cultivating a “green economy” in Vermont has led to the creation of over 1,400 new clean energy jobs in the past year and Vermont now has the highest number of per capita clean energy jobs of any U.S. state;

WHEREAS, the State has the duty to lead by example and encourage companies to promote and utilize best practices that are consistent with our efforts to reduce emissions and move to clean energy in Vermont;

WHEREAS, the legislature has expressed a strong policy in support of combatting climate change by: (a) setting goals of producing 25 percent of energy consumed in Vermont through the use of renewable energy sources by 2025,

10 V.S.A. § 580(a)
, and of reducing by 75 percent greenhouse gas emissions in Vermont from the 1990 levels by 2050,

10 V.S.A. § 578(a)
; and (b) adopting an innovative renewable energy standard with Act 56 of 2015 that sets utility renewable targets and implements solutions to address carbon emissions from the transportation and heating sectors, which
account for more than two-thirds of Vermont’s carbon emissions;

WHEREAS, Vermont’s 2016 Comprehensive Energy Plan calls for a reduction in per capita energy use of 15 percent by 2025, and calls for 90 percent renewables by 2050; and

WHEREAS, Vermont can encourage additional action on climate change through the state procurement process.

NOW, THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that I, Peter E. Shumlin, by virtue of the authority vested in me as the Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order and direct the Secretary of Administration, in consultation with the Climate Cabinet, to include processes
in the State’s acquisition policies that ensure the favorable consideration of vendor business practices that promote clean energy and take action to address climate change. The Secretary may set a minimum financial threshold for application
of these policies, and the policies shall include consideration of practices such as:

Use of thermal and electric efficiency and conservation measures;

Use of renewable energy sources for its operations;

Efforts to reduce and track carbon emissions;

Use of and encouragement of employee use of electric and zero emissions vehicles including providing workplace charging stations;

Offering employees an option for a fossil fuel divested retirement account;

Whether the supplies or services offered promote waste, energy and water efficiency; and

Other factors deemed relevant by the Secretary relating to environmentally responsible practices.

After consideration of all relevant factors, a bidder that adheres to the above best practices shall be given favorable consideration in the competitive bidding process. Favorable consideration shall be consistent with and not supersede any Secretary
of Administration guidance that, all other considerations being equal, preference will be given to resident bidders of the State and/or products raised or manufactured in the State.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated July 19, 2016

Executive Order No. 3-76
(No. 01-17) [Governor’s Strategic Goals.

WHEREAS, Vermont faces a significant challenge with its demographics: Vermont’s population is aging, and employers report challenges with recruiting and retaining a skilled workforce; and

WHEREAS, as the workforce grows smaller, the tax burden increases for those who choose to remain in Vermont; and

WHEREAS, State government has a duty to treat all Vermonters with dignity, respect all points of view, and honor the moral obligation we have to care for the vulnerable, including those struggling with substance addiction and abuse; and

WHEREAS, it is essential to restore the economic and fiscal fundamentals of the State of Vermont, strengthen the economy, and make Vermont more affordable for families and businesses.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby order and direct all State Agency Secretaries and Department Commissioners to utilize their powers, duties, and programs to establish the following cornerstones
as their strategic and operational goals:

Growing the Vermont economy;

Making Vermont an affordable place to live, work, and do business; and

Protecting vulnerable Vermonters.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated January 5, 2017

Executive Order No. 3-77
(No. 02-17) [Governor’s Opiate Coordination Council.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 3-81 (codified as Executive Order No. 09-17), dated May 8, 2017.

Executive Order No. 3-78
(No. 03-17) [Governor’s Government Modernization and Efficiency Team.

WHEREAS, Vermonters deserve modern government functions and operations which provide efficient, effective agency, department, and programmatic services now and into the future; and

WHEREAS, a dedicated team of State operational professionals, and private sector business and technology leaders will enable the Governor and extended cabinet members to evaluate both public and private sector experience in successfully implementing modernization
changes; and

WHEREAS, continuous improvement will require the empowerment of State supervisors, managers, and employees to contribute to improved program results and process efficiencies.

NOW, THEREFORE BE IT RESOLVED that I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby create the Governor’s Government Modernization and Efficiency Team (“GMET”), as follows:

Composition and Appointments.

The GMET shall consist of not more than 12 members to be appointed by the Governor from inside and outside of State government. The State members shall include the Governor’s Chief Performance Officer who shall serve as the Chair, the Governor’s Chief
Innovation Officer, the Governor’s Director of Affordability and Economic Growth Initiatives, and a classified employee of the State. Non-State members shall include leaders in information technology, telecommunications, accounting
and finance, and management and system change. The GMET may, in its discretion, establish inter-agency working groups to support its mission, drawing membership from any agency or department of State government. The GMET may
also, in its discretion, consult with private sector professionals outside of the GMET for information and advice on best practices.

The GMET shall receive administrative and staff support from the Secretary of Administration.

GMET Charge an Process.

The GMET will be advisory to the Governor and the Secretary of Administration. The GMET shall meet at the call of the Chair, but not less frequently than quarterly. The focus of the GMET shall be to:

A.
Facilitate State agency and department efficiency audits;

B.
Strengthen strategic information technology (IT) planning;

C.
Develop a digital government strategy focused on Vermonters; and

D.
Identify and advise on opportunities to:

a. Increase operational efficiency;

b. Consolidate, streamline and automate services;

c. Account for the true costs of IT projects;

d. Eliminate waste;

e. Prevent fraud and abuse; and

f. Develop metrics to be used for purposes of outcomes-based-budgeting process.

The GMET will annually report all recommendations to the Governor on or before July 1.

The GMET will advise the Governor on the effectiveness of this Order on government modernization and efficiency.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated January 5, 2017

Executive Order No. 3-79
(No. 04-17) [Program to Improve Vermont Outcomes Together (PIVOT).

WHEREAS, Vermonters deserve a modern government that provides efficient and effective services and programs that produce results now and into the future; and

WHEREAS, continuous improvement is both a culture to be adopted, as well as a toolbox that includes proven results and process improvement tools such as Lean and Results-Based Accountability; and

WHEREAS, continuous improvement should be driven by strategic outcomes (goals) contained in a living Strategic Plan; and

WHEREAS, said strategic outcomes should be monitored by using results-based indicators and programmatic performance measures to inform the level of success in achieving the strategic outcomes; and

WHEREAS, tools such as Lean should be used for process improvement by focusing on customer value-added activities, elimination of unnecessary steps and bottlenecks, and build capacity in programs and activities; and

WHEREAS, the Governor has created, by separate Executive Order, the Government Modernization and Efficiency Team, a dedicated team of State operational professionals and business and technology leaders to enable the Governor to benefit from both public
and private sector experience in successfully implementing modernization changes.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Philip B. Scott, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby order and direct the following:

Attend executive branch appointing authority Boot-Camp developed and directed by the Chief Performance Officer;

No later than July 1, 2017, develop a multi-year State Strategic Plan, in consultation with the Governmental Modernization and Efficiency Team (GMET), with consideration for the existing outcomes in

3 V.S.A. § 2311
;

Assign Agency and Department staff to participate in an internal Continuous Improvement (“CI”) team;

Assign a team lead for consideration as a participant in a statewide Continuous Improvement Steering Committee to be chaired by the Chief Performance Officer;

Select and instruct CI team members to attend Lean White and Yellow Belt training, and Green belt training where deemed necessary;

Instruct business managers and staff to attend Programmatic Budget training, and thereafter:

All Agency Secretaries, Department Commissioners, and their deputies shall:

i) No later than July 1, 2017, in consultation with the Commissioner of Finance and Management, develop a list of programs, program areas and program groups, including associated FTEs, funding, and coding;

ii) Prioritize the program list in line with the Governor’s Strategic Goals of affordability, economic growth, and protecting vulnerable Vermonters;

iii) Prioritize, in consultation with the Commissioner of Finance and Management, programs to be designated for results-based improvement and/or process improvement;

iv) Assign the CI team lead to work with the Chief Performance Officer, or designee to develop an improvement events schedule;

v) Use results-based methods and tools, such as Lean tools to develop viable changes, improvements, and action plans to achieve results and efficiency improvement;

vi) Integrate identified efficiencies and changes into programs and operations, utilizing and redeploying adding capacity, and new efficiencies attained to avoid future costs;

vii) Develop a list of future improvements requiring statutory and/or rule changes, or additional costs, for consideration;

viii) Incorporate known efficiencies and capacity building into future programmatic budgets, aligning programmatic results with the programmatic investment, and strategic outcomes;

ix) Secretaries, Commissioners, and Deputies shall report to the Governor and the GMET on a quarterly basis on the programmatic results and process improvements;

x) Secretaries, Commissioners, and Deputies shall report to the Governor annually as directed by the GMET.

(a)
Make improvements to programs and processes;

(b)
Suggest innovative solutions; achieve better outcomes; and

(c)
Provide support training, resources and tools necessary for a broad array of employees at all levels.

A Continuous Improvement Steering Committee is established to provide guidance and technical assistance for the PIVOT; the Committee shall be chaired by the Chief Performance Officer and comprised of a representative number of agency and department CI
team leads.

All Agency Secretaries, Department Commissioners, and their deputies shall ensure classified State employees, middle management, and upper management have the requisite training and knowledge and are empowered to:

All Agency Secretaries, Department Commissioners, and their deputies shall encourage participation of internal and external stakeholders to ensure that the State government is more responsive to Vermonters.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated January 5, 2017